Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 9, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Winona; Mississippi deleted text begin Riverdeleted text end new text begin Riverfront new text end Trail 5,000,000 For a grant to the city of Winona for final design, engineering, and construction of a deleted text begin bridge and bridge approaches connecting to Chestnut Street at one end and Carimona Street at the other end as part of the multipurpose nonmotorized Riverfront Trail from Levee Park to Lions Parkdeleted text end new text begin trail segment to connect portions of the Mississippi Riverfront Trail between Levee Park and Lions Park. Any unspent portion of this appropriation remaining after completion of the project listed in this subdivision, after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, is available for final design, engineering, and construction to extend the Mississippi Riverfront Trail in the city of Winonanew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end